Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3829
(UTC 403) Trusts created in other jurisdictions.

(UTC 403) A trust not created by will is validly created if its creation complies with the law of the jurisdiction in which the trust instrument was executed, or the law of the jurisdiction in which, at the time of creation:

(1) the settlor was domiciled, had a place of abode, or was a national; or

(2) except with respect to Nebraska real estate, (A) a trustee was domiciled or had a place of business; or (B) any trust property was located.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 29.